Delaware, session 153, SB76.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Â§ 2718, Title 21 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows and by redesignating accordingly: Â§ 2718. Information on licenses. (g) The Division of Motor Vehicles shall upon submission of satisfactory proof, designate on a driver license that the holder is a veteran of the United States Armed Forces or of the National Guard. uniformed services of the United States. As used in this section, âuniformed services of the United Statesâ means any of the following service branches: United States Army, United States Marine Corps, United States Navy, United States Air Force, United States Space Force, United States Coast Guard, United States Public Health Service Commissioned Corps, National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration, a reserve component of any of the service branches, or the National Guard. (1) An applicant qualifies to have designation that the holder is a veteran added to their driver license if the applicant served in the United States Armed Forces, including a reserve component of the National Guard, uniformed services of the United States and was discharged or released from service under conditions other than dishonorable: dishonorable.